fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-macatan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - macatan -  adsf : # Ordinary VII verb, Wolvengrey VII1 p 393

     macatan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: macatan
     macatan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: macatanwa
     macatan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: macataniniw
     macatan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: macataniniwa

     PV/kî+macatan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [kî-macatan]
     PV/kî+macatan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [kî-macatanwa]
     PV/kî+macatan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [kî-macataniniw]
     PV/kî+macatan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [kî-macataniniwa]
     
     PV/ka+macatan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [ka-macatan]
     PV/ka+macatan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [ka-macatanwa]
     PV/ka+macatan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [ka-macataniniw]
     PV/ka+macatan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [ka-macataniniwa]
     
     PV/wî+macatan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [wî-macatan]
     PV/wî+macatan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [wî-macatanwa]
     PV/wî+macatan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [wî-macataniniw]
     PV/wî+macatan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [wî-macataniniwa]

     PV/ê+macatan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-macatahk]
     PV/ê+macatan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-macatahki]
     PV/ê+macatan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-macataninik]  #Check
     PV/ê+macatan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-macataniniki] # Check

     PV/ê+PV/kî+macatan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-kî-macatahk]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+macatan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-kî-macatahki]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+macatan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-kî-macataninik] #Check
     PV/ê+PV/kî+macatan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-kî-macataniniki] #Check

     macatan+V+II+Cond+3Sg: macatahki
     macatan+V+II+Cond+3Pl: macatahkwâwi
     macatan+V+II+Cond+4Sg: macataniniki
     macatan+V+II+Cond+4Pl: macataninikwâwi
